Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202586-1035
Definitions, where found.

For purposes of the 911 Service System Act, the definitions found in sections 86-1036 to 86-1059 apply.

Laws 2016, LB938, § 4;

Laws 2018, LB993, § 9;

Laws 2024, LB1031, § 9;

R.S.1943, (2024), § 86-1004;

Laws 2025, LB362, § 17.